Maryland, session 2026, SB0854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
2–104.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0854*

SENATE BILL 854
(a) In this section, “federal law enforcement officer” means an officer who may:
(1) make an arrest with or without a warrant for violations of the United
States Code; and
(2) carry firearms in the performance of the officer’s duties.
(b) (1) Subject to the limitations of paragraph (2) of this subsection, a federal
law enforcement officer may:
(i) make arrests as set forth in Subtitle 2 of this title; and
(ii) execute arrest and search and seizure warrants issued under the
laws of the State.
(2) A federal law enforcement officer may exercise the powers granted by
this subsection when:
(i) THE FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER IS ACTING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH STATE LAW; AND
(II) 1. the federal law enforcement officer is participating in a
joint investigation with officials from a State or local law enforcement unit;
[(ii)] 2. the federal law enforcement officer is rendering assistance
to a police officer;
[(iii)] 3. the federal law enforcement officer is acting at the request
of a local police officer or State Police officer; or
[(iv)] 4. an emergency [exists] IS IN EFFECT UNDER § 14–107 OR
§ 14–111 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(c) (1) A federal law enforcement officer who acts under the authority granted
by this section shall notify the following persons of an investigation, an enforcement action,
or a federal immigration enforcement action at a sensitive location, as defined in § 6–111
of the State Government Article:
(i) 1. the chief of police, if any, or chief’s designee, when in a
municipal corporation;
2. the police commissioner or police commissioner’s designee,
when in Baltimore City;

SENATE BILL 854 3
3. the chief of police or chief’s designee, when in a county
with a county police department, except Baltimore City;
4. the sheriff or sheriff’s designee, when in a county without
a county police department;
5. the Secretary of Natural Resources or Secretary’s
designee, when on property owned, leased, operated by, or under the control of the
Department of Natural Resources; or
6. the chief of police of the Maryland Transportation
Authority or chief’s designee, when on property owned, leased, operated by, or under the
control of the Maryland Transportation Authority, Maryland Aviation Administration, or
Maryland Port Administration; and
(ii) the Department of State Police barrack commander or
commander’s designee, unless there is an agreement otherwise with the Department of
State Police.
(2) When the federal law enforcement officer participates in a joint
investigation with officials from a State or local law enforcement unit, the federal law
enforcement officer shall give the notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection
reasonably in advance.
(d) A federal law enforcement officer who acts under the authority granted by this
section:
(1) has the same legal status as a police officer;
(2) has the same protections as a police officer under § 2–608 of the Courts
Article with regard to charging documents against police officers; and
(3) has the same immunity from liability described in § 5–611 of the Courts
Article.
(e) This section does not impose liability on or require indemnification by the
State or a local subdivision for an act performed by a federal law enforcement officer under
this section.
Article – Public Safety
3–535.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 854
(2) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
2–608 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE.
(3) (I) “RACIAL PROFILING” MEANS RELYING, TO ANY DEGREE, ON
A PERSON’S ACTUAL OR PERCEIVED RACE, ETHNICITY, OR NATIONAL ORIGIN IN
TAKING ANY LAW ENFORCEMENT ACTION AGAINST THE PERSON.
(II) “RACIAL PROFILING” DOES NOT INCLUDE RELIANCE BY A
LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER ON A PERSON’S ACTUAL OR PERCEIVED RACE,
ETHNICITY, OR NATIONAL ORIGIN IN COMBINATION WITH OTHER IDENTIFYING
FACTORS WHEN THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER IS SEEKING TO APPREHEND A
SPECIFIC SUSPECT WHOSE RACE, ETHNICITY, OR NATIONAL ORIGIN IS PART OF THE
DESCRIPTION OF THE SUSPECT WANTED IN CONNECTION WITH A SPECIFIC
OFFENSE.
(B) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY
NOT ENGAGE IN RACIAL PROFILING.
(C) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY NOT TAKE RETALIATORY PUNITIVE
ACTION AGAINST A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO DISCLOSES INFORMATION
CONCERNING RACIAL PROFILING.
(D) (1) A PERSON HARMED BY A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF
THIS SECTION MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION IN THE CIRCUIT COURT WHERE THE
ALLEGED VIOLATION OCCURRED OR WHERE THE PLAINTIFF RESIDES.
(2) (I) A PLAINTIFF MAY ESTABLISH A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION THROUGH DIRECT OR CIRCUMSTANTIAL EVIDENCE.
(II) EVIDENCE OF ANIMUS IS NOT NEEDED TO ESTABLISH A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(3) IF A COURT FINDS THAT A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OR (C)
OF THIS SECTION OCCURRED, THE COURT MAY AWARD:
(I) COMPENSATORY DAMAGES;
(II) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
(III) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND LITIGATION
EXPENSES, INCLUDING EXPERT WITNESS FEES AND EXPENSES; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE RELIEF.

SENATE BILL 854 5
(E) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL
DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A WRITTEN POLICY CONSISTENT WITH THIS SECTION.
(F) THIS SECTION SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED TO EFFECTUATE ITS
PURPOSE.
3–536.
A STATE OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER MAY NOT TAKE ANY ACTION
PROHIBITED BY STATE LAW, EVEN WHEN ACTING UNDER COLOR OF FEDERAL LAW
PURSUANT TO AN AGREEMENT DEPUTIZING THE STATE OR LOCAL OFFICER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.